Hawaii statutes.
§803-48 Recovery of civil damages
authorized. Any person whose wire, oral, or electronic communication is
accessed, intercepted, disclosed, or used in violation of this part shall[:]

(1) Have a civil cause of action against any person
who accesses, intercepts, discloses, or uses, or procures any other person to
access, intercept, disclose, or use the communications[;] and

(2) Be entitled to recover from any such person:

(A) The greater of[:]

(i) The sum of the actual damages suffered by
the plaintiff and any profits made by the violator as a result of the violation[;]
or

(ii) Statutory damages of the greater of $100 a
day for each day of violation or $10,000;

(B) Punitive damages, where appropriate; and

(C) A reasonable attorney's fee and other
litigation costs reasonably incurred.

The aggrieved person may also seek and be awarded
such preliminary, and other equitable or declaratory relief as may be
appropriate. A good faith reliance on a court order shall constitute a
complete defense to any civil action brought under this part. [L 1978, c 218,
pt of §2; am L 1986, c 303, §8; am L 1989, c 164, §10; am L 2006, c 200, pt of
§4]

Revision Note

In the first sentence, (1) and (2) reformatted as paragraphs
(1) and (2) and (A)(i) and (ii) reformatted as clauses (i) and (ii) pursuant to
§23G-15.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next